Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.360

State, county, school, municipal corporation lands—Assessment—Recipients of notices, ballots.

Lands owned by the state, county, school district or any municipal corporation may be assessed and charged for road improvements authorized under this chapter in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as provided by law for assessments against such property for local improvements in cities and towns.

All notices and ballots provided for herein affecting state lands shall be sent to the department of natural resources whose designated agent is hereby authorized to sign petitions or ballots on behalf of the state. In the case of counties or municipal or quasi municipal bodies notices and ballots shall be sent to the legislative authority of said counties or municipality and petitions or ballots shall be signed by the officer duly empowered to act by said legislative authority.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.360. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 36.]